Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.133.020

Eligibility.

To be eligible for the educational assistance grant program for students with dependents, applicants shall: (1) Be residents of the state of Washington; (2) be students who demonstrate financial need as defined in RCW 28B.92.030; (3) be eligible to participate in the Washington college grant program as set forth under chapter 28B.92 RCW; and (4) have dependents eighteen years of age or younger who are under their care.

[ 2019 c 406 s 47; 2004 c 275 s 73; 2003 c 19 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.